Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-146.02
Medical history; requirements.

A child placement agency, the department, or a private agency handling the adoption, as the case may be, shall maintain and shall provide to the adopting parents upon placement of the person with such parents and to the adopted person, upon his or her request, the available medical history of the person placed for adoption and of the biological parents. The medical history shall not include the names of the biological parents of the adopted person or any other identifying information.

Laws 1988, LB 372, § 7;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 44;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 92.